Hawaii statutes.
§355-2 Commitment or transfer of inmate.
Any court or other agency or officer of the State having power to commit or
transfer an inmate (as defined in Article 2(d) of the Western Interstate
Corrections Compact) to any institution for confinement may commit or transfer
the inmate to any institution within or without the State if the State has
entered into a contract or contracts for the confinement of inmates in the
institution pursuant to Article 3 of the Western Interstate Corrections
Compact. [L 1965, c 118, §2; Supp, §83E-2; HRS §355-2]

Case Notes

Re "due process" requirements for out-of-state
transfers of prisoners. 387 F. Supp. 912 (1975); 396 F. Supp. 196 (1975).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next